New Jersey, session 222, S1855.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, a person commits a fourth degree crime if he falsely pretends to be a transportation network company driver for the purpose of obtaining a benefit for himself or another or to injure or defraud another. b.    A person commits a crime of the third degree if he falsely pretends to be a transportation network company driver and knowingly exhibits or displays a falsely purported identifying marker as set forth in section 23 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-23) or some other identification for the purpose of obtaining a benefit for himself or another or to injure or defraud another. c.    Nothing herein shall be deemed to preclude, if the evidence so warrants, an indictment and conviction for murder, manslaughter, assault, or any other offense. d.  It shall not be a crime under this section for a transportation network company driver to provide cash rides. e. As used in this section: Transportation network company driver has the meaning set forth in section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2). Benefit has the meaning set forth in N.J.S.2C:21-17. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.